Nevada, session 83, AB345.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.5 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. 1. The Board of Regents shall establish and
maintain a data dashboard relating to the educational and
professional outcomes of students that includes, without
limitation, statistical data relating to the number of:
(a) Students who graduated from a public high school in this
State and enroll in a university, state college or community college
within the System;
(b) Students who graduated from a high school in this State
and enroll in remedial courses in reading, writing or mathematics
at a university, state college or community college within the
System or who are identified as not being college-ready in such
subjects and enrolled in a corequisite support course;
(c) Years it takes for students, on average, to graduate from a
university, state college or community college within the System;
and
(d) Subject to the availability of data, the number of students
who graduate from a university, state college or community
college within the System and, within 2 years of graduation, have:
(1) Not received wages from an employer in this State and
are not enrolled in an institution within the Nevada System of
Higher Education; and
(2) Received unemployment benefits or benefits from a
program of public assistance after graduating.
2. The data dashboard established pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Must be posted on or otherwise accessible through the
Internet website of the System on or before September 1, 2026;
and
(b) Must not include any personal identifying information of
any student or other person.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
3. Any state agency or local government, including, without
limitation, a school district, may assist the Board of Regents in
establishing and maintaining the data dashboard established
pursuant to subsection 1.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Corequisite support course” means a course taken
simultaneously with a first college-level or foundation course for a
program of study that supports the topics being covered in the first
college-level or foundation course.
(b) “Employer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 612.055.
Sec. 1.5. The Board of Regents shall establish a policy for
the use of low-cost course materials and no-cost open educational
resources in courses offered at an institution within the Nevada
System of Higher Education. The policy must include, without
limitation:
1. A definition of “low-cost course materials” and “no-cost
open educational resources”; and
2. A uniform system to identify, and mark for identification
within the course registration system used at each institution, each
course that exclusively uses low-cost course materials and no-cost
open educational resources.
Sec. 2. 1. During the 2025-2026 interim, the Board of
Regents of the University of Nevada shall conduct a study on
financial and food insecurity among students within the Nevada
System of Higher Education. The study must include, without
limitation:
(a) An examination of the financial and food insecurity issues
experienced by students of the System.
(b) The identification of factors that contribute to the temporary
withdrawal of students from enrollment in academic programs due
to financial and food insecurity.
(c) An evaluation of potential interventions to the financial and
food insecurity experienced by students in the System, which may
include, without limitation, allowing a student who has outstanding
debts or delinquent fees owed to the System to register for courses.
(d) Data-driven policy recommendations for ways to reduce the
financial and food insecurity of students of the System.
2. On or before July 1, 2026, the Board of Regents shall
prepare and submit a report of its findings to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
3. The Board of Regents may accept gifts, grants and donations
to carry out the duties set forth in this section.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1, 1.3 and 2 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
3. Section 1.5 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)